Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2534.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Artificial Intelligence Transparency Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Artificial intelligence." A machine-based system that can, for a given set of human-defined objectives, make predictions, recommendations or decisions influencing real or virtual environments. The term includes:(1) Systems that use machine and human-based inputs to 12345678910111213141516171819 perceive real and virtual environments, abstract perceptions into models through analysis in an automated manner and use model inference to formulate options for information or action.(2) Generative artificial intelligence."Consumer." An individual residing in this Commonwealth."Covered provider." An entity that creates, codes or otherwise produces a generative artificial intelligence system that has more than 1,000,000 monthly active users and is publicly accessible within this Commonwealth."Digital signature." A cryptography-based method that identifies the user that attests to the information provided in the signed section."Generative artificial intelligence." The class of models that emulate the structure and characteristics of input data in order to generate derived synthetic digital content, including information such as images, videos, audio clips or text, that has been significantly modified or generated by algorithms, including by artificial intelligence."Generative artificial intelligence system." Artificial intelligence that incorporates generative artificial intelligence."Generative artificial intelligence system hosting platform." A publicly accessible Internet website or application that makes available for download the source code or model weights of a generative artificial intelligence system to a person in this Commonwealth, regardless of whether the terms of that use include compensation."Large online platform." The following:(1) A public-facing social media platform, file sharing 20260HB2534PN3431 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 platform, mass messaging platform or stand-alone search engine that distributes digital content to users who did not create or collaborate in creating the digital content that exceeded 2,000,000 unique monthly users during the preceding 12 months.(2) The term does not include:(i) A provider of broadband Internet access service as defined in 47 CFR 8.1(b) (relating to transparency).(ii) A provider of telecommunications service as defined in 47 U.S.C. § 153(53) (relating to definitions)."Latent disclosure." Information embedded in or linked from digital content that indicates the origin of the digital content and the manner in which it was generated or altered by artificial intelligence."Manifest disclosure." A visible disclosure that informs an individual that the digital content has been created or altered by artificial intelligence."Mass messaging platform." A direct messaging platform that allows users to distribute digital content to more than 100 users simultaneously."Metadata." The structural or descriptive information about data."Personal information." Any information that is linked or reasonably linkable to an identified or identifiable individual."Personal provenance data." Any provenance data that contains either of the following:(1) Personal information.(2) Unique device, system or service information that is reasonably capable of being associated with a particular user.20260HB2534PN3431 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Provenance data." Any data that is embedded into digital content or that is included in the digital content's metadata for the purpose of verifying the digital content's authenticity, origin or history of modification."System provenance data." Any provenance data that is not reasonably capable of being associated with a particular user and that contains either of the following:(1) Information regarding the type of device, system or service that was used to generate a piece of digital content.(2) Information related to digital content authenticity.Section 3. Covered providers.(a) Detection tool.--A covered provider shall make available, at no cost to the user, an artificial intelligence detection tool that meets all of the following criteria:(1) The tool allows a user to assess whether image, video or audio digital content, or digital content that is any combination thereof, was created or altered by the covered provider's generative artificial intelligence system.(2) The tool outputs any system provenance data that is detected in the digital content.(3) The tool does not output any personal provenance data that is detected in the digital content.(4) The tool is publicly accessible. A covered provider may impose reasonable limitations on access to the tool to prevent or respond to demonstrable risks to the security or integrity of its generative artificial intelligence system.(5) The tool allows a user to upload digital content or provide a uniform resource locator linking to online digital content.(6) The tool provides an application programming 20260HB2534PN3431 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 interface that allows a user to invoke the tool without visiting the covered provider's publicly accessible Internet website.(b) User feedback.--A covered provider shall collect user feedback related to the efficacy of the covered provider's artificial intelligence detection tool and incorporate relevant feedback into any attempt to improve the efficacy of the tool.(c) Prohibitions.--A covered provider may not do any of the following:(1) Collect or retain personal information from a user of the covered provider's artificial intelligence detection tool, except as follows:(i) A covered provider may collect and retain the contact information of a user who submits feedback if the user opts into being contacted by the covered provider.(ii) User information collected under subparagraph (i) shall be used only to evaluate and improve the efficacy of the covered provider's artificial intelligence detection tool.(2) Retain any digital content submitted to the artificial intelligence detection tool for longer than 24 hours unless the user expressly consents to longer retention for tool improvement.(3) Retain any personal provenance data from digital content submitted to the artificial intelligence detection tool by a user.Section 4. Disclosures.(a) Option.--A covered provider shall offer to each user the option to include in image, video or audio digital content, or digital content that is any combination thereof, created or 20260HB2534PN3431 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 altered by the covered provider's generative artificial intelligence system a manifest disclosure that meets all of the following criteria:(1) The disclosure identifies digital content as artificial intelligence generated digital content.(2) The disclosure is clear, conspicuous, appropriate for the medium of the digital content and understandable to a reasonable person.(3) The disclosure is permanent or not reasonably removable to the extent it is technically feasible.(b) Latent disclosure.--A covered provider shall include a latent disclosure in an artificial intelligence generated image, video or audio digital content, or digital content that is any combination thereof, created by the covered provider's generative artificial intelligence system that meets all of the following criteria:(1) To the extent that it is technically feasible and reasonable, the disclosure shall convey all of the following information, either directly or through a link to a publicly accessible Internet website:(i) The name of the covered provider.(ii) The name and version number of the generative artificial intelligence system that created or altered the digital content.(iii) The time and date of the digital content's creation or alteration.(iv) A unique identifier.(2) The disclosure is detectable by the covered provider's artificial intelligence detection tool.(3) The disclosure is consistent with widely accepted 20260HB2534PN3431 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 industry standards.(4) The disclosure is permanent or difficult to remove to the extent it is technically feasible.(c) Third parties.--(1) If a covered provider licenses its generative artificial intelligence system to a third party, the covered provider shall require by contract that the licensee maintain the system's capability to include a disclosure required by subsection (b) in digital content the system creates or alters.(2) If a covered provider knows that a third-party licensee modified a licensed generative artificial intelligence system so that it is no longer capable of including a disclosure required by subsection (b) in digital content that the system creates or alters, the covered provider shall revoke the license within four calendar days of discovering the licensee's action.(3) A third-party licensee shall cease using a licensed generative artificial intelligence system after the license for the system has been revoked by the covered provider under paragraph (2).Section 5. Large online platforms.(a) Requirements.--A large online platform shall do all of the following:(1) Detect whether any provenance data that is compliant with widely accepted industry standards is embedded into or attached to digital content distributed on the large online platform.(2) Provide a user interface to disclose the availability of system provenance data that reliably 20260HB2534PN3431 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 indicates that the digital content was generated or substantially altered by a generative artificial intelligence system. The user interface shall make clear and conspicuously available to users information sufficient to identify the digital content's authenticity, origin or history of modification, including all of the following:(i) Whether provenance data is available.(ii) The name of the generative artificial intelligence system that created or substantially altered the digital content, if applicable.(iii) Whether any digital signatures are available.(3) Allow a user to inspect all available system provenance data that is compliant with widely accepted industry standards in an easily accessible manner by any of the following means:(i) Directly through the large online platform's user interface under paragraph (2).(ii) By downloading a version of the digital content with its attached system provenance data.(iii) Through a link to the digital content's system provenance data displayed on a publicly accessible Internet website or in another application provided either by the large online platform or a third party.(b) Prohibition.--A large online platform shall not knowingly strip any system provenance data or digital signature that is compliant with widely accepted industry standards from digital content uploaded or distributed on the large online platform.Section 6. Generative artificial intelligence system hosting platforms.20260HB2534PN3431 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 A generative artificial intelligence system hosting platform shall not knowingly make available a generative artificial intelligence system that does not place disclosures under section 4.Section 7. Complaints.(a) Filing.--A consumer may file a complaint with the Bureau of Consumer Protection in the Office of Attorney General alleging a violation of this act.(b) Investigation and penalty.--The Bureau of Consumer Protection in the Office of Attorney General shall investigate complaints filed under subsection (a). If, after investigating a complaint, the Attorney General finds a violation of this act, the Attorney General may:(1) Bring an action to impose a civil penalty up to $5,000 for each violation.(2) Seek injunctive relief, restitution, costs and other relief under the act of December 17, 1968 (P.L.1224, No.387), known as the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law.(c) Sole penalty and construction.--(1) The civil penalty under subsection (b) shall be the sole penalty for conduct in violation of this act.(2) Nothing in this act shall be construed to create or imply a private cause of action for a violation of this act.Section 8. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 180 days.20260HB2534PN3431 - 9 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526